Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.220

Unlawful business practices—Penalty.

(1) Every licensee who pays, or causes to be paid, directly or indirectly, money, or other valuable consideration, for the securing of business is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

(2) Every person who sells, or offers for sale, any share, certificate, or interest in the business of any funeral director or embalmer, or in any corporation, firm, or association owning or operating a funeral establishment, which promises to give to the purchaser a right to the services of the funeral director, embalmer, or corporation, firm, or association at a charge or cost less than that offered or given to the public, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2005 c 365 s 19; 2003 c 53 s 129; 1981 c 43 s 16; 1937 c 108 s 13; RRS s 8323-2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Violations—Penalty—Unfair practice under chapter 19.86 RCW: RCW 18.39.350.